ext/fulltext/data/dicts/german/fulltext.dict
Abgang/Sp
Absatzmarkt/STp
Absatzverhältnis/Qq
Abschreibungserfordernis/Qq
Abzahlungskauf/STp
Adressbus/Qq
Aktienkauf/Sp
Alleingang/Sp
Alleinvertretungsanbefugnis/q
Amtsgeheimnis/Qq
Analyseergebnis/Qq
Anfall/Sp
Angestelltenverhältnis/Qq
Anlagenzugang/Sp
Anschlusszug/STp
Anzug/STp
Arbeitsausschuss/Tp
Arbeitserlaubnis/q
Arbeitsvorgang/Sp
Ärgernis/Qq
auffrass/PZp
Auflösungsbeschluss/Tp
Auftragsabschluss/Tp
Ausgabeaufschlag/Sp
Auslauf/STp
Ausreiseerlaubnis/q
Ausstoss/JTp
Autobus/Qq
Automatikablauf/Sp
Ballonflug/STp
Bankgeheimnis/Qq
Bargeldumlauf/Sp
Bauantrag/STp
Bedrängnis/q
Befugnis/q
Behang/STp
Beichtgeheimnis/Qq
Bekümmernis/q
Beratungsausschuss/Tp
Berechnungsergebnis/Qq
Berufsgeheimnis/Qq
Besichtigungsflug/STp
Besorgnis/q
Betriebsüberschuss/Tp
Betrübnis/q
Bewegungsspielraum/Sp
Bildnis/Qq
Bildraum/STp
Bildverzeichnis/Qq
Bitternis/q
Blockhaus/Tp
Bombenflug/Sp
Branchenverzeichnis/Qq
Brokerhaus/Tp
Bühnenraum/STp
Bürokenntnis/q
Büroschluss/Tp
Christbaum/STp
Datenanschluss/Tp
Datenbus/Qq
Demokratieverständnis/Qq
Dialogablauf/Sp
Dienstgeheimnis/Qq
Diskus/Qq
Divisionsraum/STp
Druckerlaubnis/q
Druckverhältnis/Qq
durchdrang/PZp
Durchmarscherlaubnis/q
Edelmetallerzeugnis/Qq
Eigentumsverhältnis/Qq
Einfall/Sp
Einsendeschluss/Tp
Einverständnis/Qq
Elektromarkt/STp
Emissionsergebnis/Qq
Endergebnis/Qq
Entwicklungsauftrag/STp
Ereignis/Qq
Erfordernis/Qq
Erlaubnis/q
Ermittlungsbefugnis/q
Ernteergebnis/Qq
Eroberungsfeldzug/STp
Ersparnis/q
Erzeugnis/Qq
Exekutivbefugnis/q
Extremfall/Sp
Familienbedürfnis/Qq
Familienhaus/Tp
Fäulnis/q
Feldzug/STp
Fiebertraum/STp
Finsternis/q
Flachschuss/Tp
Fluss/MTp
Forschungsergebnis/Qq
fräs/EPZq
Freiflug/STp
Fremdsprachenkenntnis/q
Führungszeugnis/Qq
Fürstenhaus/Tp
Gas/EPTq
Gedenkzug/STp
Gefängnis/Qq
Geldumlauf/Sp
Gelöbnis/Qq
Geruchsverschluss/Tp
Gesamtergebnis/Qq
Gesamtverständnis/Qq
Geschehnis/Qq
Gesellschaftshaus/Tp
Geständnis/Qq
Gewaltverhältnis/Qq
Gewissenszwang/Sp
Glaubensbekenntnis/Qq
Grenzhindernis/Qq
Grenzlandausschuss/Tp
Grunderfordernis/Qq
Gründungsausschuss/Tp
Gusserzeugnis/Qq
Halbzeitergebnis/Qq
Handelsüberschuss/Tp
Hauptverzeichnis/Qq
Haustechnikraum/STp
Hebelverhältnis/Qq
Herstellerverzeichnis/Qq
Hindernis/Qq
Hitzschlag/STp
Hosenanzug/STp
Informationsfluss/Tp
Inhaltsverzeichnis/Qq
Jagdverhältnis/Qq
Jahresüberschuss/Tp
Kahlschlag/Sp
Karos/q
Kassenabschluss/Tp
Kesselhaus/Tp
Klangereignis/Qq
Klettverschluss/Tp
Kochkenntnis/q
Konfektionshaus/Tp
Konsumbedürfnis/Qq
Kontrollausschuss/Tp
Krankheitsfall/Sp
Kriegsereignis/Qq
Kriminalfall/Sp
Kulis/q
Kursgewinnverhältnis/Qq
Kurzvortrag/STp
Langzeitgedächtnis/Qq
Lastenaufzug/STp
Lebensverhältnis/Qq
Leerverkauf/Sp
Lichtverhältnis/Qq
lies/q
Literaturverzeichnis/Qq
Lohnabschluss/Tp
Machtbefugnis/q
Mahlerzeugnis/Qq
Marktkenntnis/q
Massenmarkt/Tp
Menschenkenntnis/q
Messraum/STp
Mietverhältnis/Qq
Missverhältnis/Qq
Modehaus/Tp
Molkereierzeugnis/Qq
Nachlass/Tp
Nähkenntnis/q
Nennbetrag/STp
Nichtraucherraum/STp
Offiziersball/Sp
Omnibus/Qq
Parteiauftrag/STp
Penis/Qq
Pferdestall/Sp
Prämienzuschlag/STp
Preisverhältnis/Qq
Programmablauf/STp
Projektergebnis/Qq
Ratsbeschluss/Tp
Raumverhältnis/Qq
Regelausschlag/STp
Rekordergebnis/Qq
Rettungsschuss/Tp
Russlandfeldzug/STp
Säulengang/STp
Schienenbus/Qq
Schiffsraum/STp
Schneckengang/Sp
Schulhaus/Tp
Schulversäumnis/Qq
Schwimmfuss/Tp
Selbsterkenntnis/q
Sensoreingang/Sp
Sittenverderbnis/q
Sonderfall/Sp
Spannungsverhältnis/Qq
Speisehaus/Tp
Sportausschuss/Tp
Staatsbegräbnis/Qq
Stall/JSp
Steuereingang/Sp
Steuerersparnis/q
Stichwortverzeichnis/Qq
Streckenverlauf/STp
Suchlauf/Sp
Tastverhältnis/Qq
Taubenschlag/STp
Tiefgang/Sp
Torverhältnis/Qq
Trauerzug/STp
Überfluss/Tp
Ukas/Qq
Umlauf/Sp
Unterverzeichnis/Qq
Vaterhaus/Tp
Verhandlungsergebnis/Qq
Verkehrshindernis/Qq
Verlustvortrag/STp
Vermächtnis/Qq
Vertragsverhältnis/Qq
Vibrationsverlauf/Sp
Vorkommnis/Qq
Vorlauf/STp
Wahlausschuss/Tp
Wahlbündnis/Qq
Warmlauf/Sp
Weidenbaum/STp
Weltereignis/Qq
Wettbewerbsverhältnis/Qq
Wettflug/STp
Witterungsumschlag/STp
Zahlenverhältnis/Qq
Zeitlauf/Sp
Zeugnis/Qq
Zug/ETVp
Zustandsraum/STp
Zweckverhältnis/Qq
